Massachusetts, session 194th, H3295.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department
of capital asset management and maintenance and the town of Southwick may enter into a
license for a renewable term of 5-years to use the North pond boat ramp on Point Grove road in
the town of Southwick for parking purposes.
SECTION 2. The license in section 1 shall not be a disposition of an interest in land of
the commonwealth and shall not be subject to Article 97 of the Amendments to the
Massachusetts Constitution or section 5A of chapter 3 of the General Laws.
of 1